Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1849.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 461 of Title 10, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created until November 1, 2028, in
accordance with the Oklahoma Sunset Law, the Teacher Recruitment and
Retention Program to be administered by Oklahoma Partnership for
School Readiness.
HB1849 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

B. The Program, through Oklahoma Partnership for School
Readiness, shall ensure that:
1. Any employee who is employed by a child care facility
licensed pursuant to the Oklahoma Child Care Facilities Licensing
Act shall have household income exempted from consideration when
eligibility is determined for the Child Care Subsidy Program
administered by the Department of Human Services;
2. When an employee who is employed by a licensed child care
facility leaves employment of the licensed provider, the provider
shall provide written notice to the Department of Human Services
that the employee is no longer employed within thirty (30) days; and
3. Other than the income exemption pursuant to paragraph 1 of
this subsection and the reporting requirements established pursuant
to this subsection, all other conditions of eligibility for the
Child Care Subsidy Program located in the Oklahoma Administrative
Code (OAC) shall be followed.
C. Subsection B of this section shall not apply to employees
who are employed by a child care facility licensed pursuant to the
Oklahoma Child Care Facilities Licensing Act and who are eligible
for the Child Care Subsidy Program without household income being
exempted.
D. The Department of Human Services shall waive copayments for
employees who are employed by a licensed child care facility and who

HB1849 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

qual ify under income eligibility requirements of the Child Care
Subsidy Program.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS AND BUDGET, dated
03/05/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.



















HB1849 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.